Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.33, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Filing fees; allocations. (a) In addition to all other statutory fees and taxes: (1) an $8 filing fee is imposed on every vehicle registration renewal, excluding pro rate transactions; and (2) a $12 filing fee is imposed on every other type of vehicle transaction, including motor carrier fuel licenses under sections 168D.05 and 168D.06, and pro rate transactions. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a): (1) a filing fee may not be charged for a document returned for a refund or for a correction of an error made by the Department of Public Safety, a dealer, or a deputy registrar; and (2) no filing fee or other fee may be charged for the permanent surrender of a title for a vehicle. (c) The filing fee must be shown as a separate item on all registration renewal notices sent out by the commissioner. (d) The statutory fees and taxes, the filing fees imposed under paragraph (a), and the surcharge imposed under paragraph (f) may be paid by credit card or debit card. The deputy registrar may collect a surcharge on the payment made under this paragraph not greater than the cost of processing a credit card or debit card transaction, in accordance with emergency rules established by the commissioner of public safety. The surcharge authorized by this paragraph must be used to pay the cost of processing credit and debit card transactions. (e) The fees collected under paragraph (a) by the department must be allocated as follows: (1) of the fees collected under paragraph (a), clause (1): (i) $6.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1; and (ii) $1.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3; and (2) of the fees collected under paragraph (a), clause (2): (i) $3.50 must be deposited in the general fund; (ii) $7 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1; and (iii) $1.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. (f) In addition to all other statutory fees and taxes, a deputy registrar must assess a $1 surcharge on every transaction for which filing fees are collected under this subdivision. The surcharge authorized by this paragraph must be (1) deposited in the treasury of the place for which the deputy registrar is appointed, or (2) if the deputy registrar is not a public official, retained by the deputy registrar. For purposes of this paragraph, a deputy registrar does not include the commissioner. new text begin (g) The commissioner must not advertise, promote, or refer to the surcharge imposed under paragraph (f) or the difference in statutory fees imposed between in-person transactions and online transactions on a vehicle registration renewal notice, materials accompanying a vehicle registration renewal notice, or the Division of Driver and Vehicle Services website except upon payment to complete the transaction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2025, for renewal notices issued on or after that date. new text end